Arkansas, session 2025, HB1080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-2-133 is repealed.
10-2-133. Increased cost obligations for health benefit plans — Fiscal
impact statement required — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Entity of the state” means any agency, board, bureau,
commission, committee, council, department, division, institution of higher
education, office, public school, quasi-public organization, or other
political subdivision of the state;
*JET011*
01/10/2025 5:05:05 PM JET011

HB1080
(2) “Fiscal impact statement” means a realistic written
statement of the purpose of a proposed law and the estimated financial cost
to an entity of the state for implementing or complying with the proposed
law; and
(3) “Health benefit plan” means a policy, contract, certificate,
or agreement offered or issued by an entity to provide, deliver, arrange for,
pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, including
pharmacy benefits, to an entity of the state.
(b)(1) A bill filed in the House of Representatives or the Senate that
will impose a new or increased cost obligation for health benefit plans,
including pharmacy benefits, on an entity of the state shall:
(A) Have a fiscal impact statement attached to the bill
prepared and filed with the chair of the committee to which the bill is
referred; and
(B) Not be taken up by the committee to which the bill is
referred until a fiscal impact statement is provided to the chair of the
committee.
(2) The services of actuaries may be obtained in evaluating the
respective bills and preparing the fiscal impact statement.
(c)(1)(A) If a House bill or Senate bill is called up for final
passage in the House of Representatives or the Senate and a fiscal impact
statement has not been provided by the author of the bill or by the committee
to which the bill was referred, a member of the House of Representatives or
the Senate may object to the bill's being called up for final passage until a
fiscal impact statement is prepared and made available on the desk of each
member of the House of Representatives or the Senate at least one (1) day
before the bill's being called up for final passage.
(B) An affirmative vote of two-thirds (⅔) of a quorum
present and voting shall override the objection.
(2) If an objection is made without override, the presiding
officer of the House of Representatives or the Senate shall cause the bill to
be referred to an actuary for the preparation of a fiscal impact statement,
which shall be filed with the presiding officer not later than five (5) days
from the date of the request.
(d) A fiscal impact statement required by this section shall be
developed by an actuary within the guidelines adopted by the House Committee
01/10/2025 5:05:05 PM JET011

HB1080
on Insurance and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce,
as applicable.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-5-421 is repealed.
21-5-421. Introduction of bills affecting State and Public School Life
and Health Insurance Program — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Entity of the state” means any agency, board, bureau,
commission, committee, council, department, division, institution of higher
education, office, public school, quasi-public organization, or other
political subdivision of the state; and
(2) “Health benefit plan” means a policy, contract, certificate,
or agreement offered or issued by an entity to provide, deliver, arrange for,
pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of healthcare services, including
pharmacy benefits, to an entity of the state.
(b) A bill affecting the State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program or that imposes a new or increased cost obligation for
health benefit plans, including pharmacy benefits, on an entity of the state
to be considered by the General Assembly at a regular session shall be
introduced in the General Assembly during the first fifteen (15) calendar
days of a regular session.
(c)(1) A bill as described in subsection (b) of this section shall not
be introduced after the fifteenth day of a regular session unless the
introduction of the bill is first approved by a three-fourths (¾) vote of the
full membership of each house of the General Assembly.
(2) If the General Assembly recesses for longer than three (3)
consecutive days during the first fifteen (15) days of a regular session, the
fifteen-day introduction deadline shall be extended for a time period equal
to the recess.
(d) A bill affecting the State and Public School Life and Health
Insurance Program or that imposes a new or increased cost obligation for
health benefit plans, including pharmacy benefits, on an entity of the state
shall not be introduced or considered at a fiscal session or an extraordinary
session of the General Assembly unless the introduction and consideration of
the bill is first approved by a two-thirds (⅔) vote of the full membership of
each house of the General Assembly.
01/10/2025 5:05:05 PM JET011